Louisiana, session 2026, HB388.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:2164(A) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 37:2159.1(9)
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2159.1. Contracting; prohibited acts; property insurance
The following acts are prohibited by persons performing contracting services:
* * *
(9) Unsolicited homeowner contact including but not limited to door
hangers, business cards, magnets, flyers, pamphlets, text messages, emails, or any
unscheduled sales visits.
* * *
§2164. Violations; civil penalty; jurisdiction
A. Any person who violates any provision of this Chapter shall, after notice
and a hearing, be liable to the board for a fine of up to ten twenty percent of the total
contract or the value of the work bid or being performed for which there is a
violation. In addition to the fine, the board may impose administrative costs and
attorney fees for each offense. In determining the amount of the administrative
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 388
penalty, the board or residential subcommittee shall consider the circumstances and
seriousness of the violation, cooperation on the part of the contractor, and the history
of previous violations.
* * *